Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1208.01
Paramedic practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Paramedic practice of emergency medical care means care provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for a paramedic. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) all of the acts that an advanced emergency medical technician is authorized to perform, (2) visualized intubation, (3) surgical cricothyrotomy, and (4) until December 31, 2025, all of the acts that an emergency medical technician-intermediate is authorized to perform.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 16;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 3.